Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 3
LICENSING PROCEDURES

44-10-301. Local licensing authority - applications - licenses.

A local licensing authority may issue only the following medical marijuana licenses upon payment of the fee and compliance with all local licensing requirements to be determined by the local licensing authority:

A medical marijuana store license;

A medical marijuana cultivation facility license;

A medical marijuana products manufacturer license;

A medical marijuana testing facility license;

A medical marijuana transporter license;

A medical marijuana business operator license;

A marijuana research and development license; and

A medical marijuana delivery permit.

A local licensing authority shall not issue a local license to a medical marijuana business within a municipality, city and county, or the unincorporated portion of a county unless the governing body of the municipality or city and county has adopted an ordinance, or the governing body of the county has adopted a resolution, containing specific standards for license issuance, or if no such ordinance or resolution is adopted prior to July 1, 2012, then a local licensing authority shall consider the minimum licensing requirements of this part 3 when issuing a license.
(2) (a) (I) A local licensing authority shall not issue a local license to a medical marijuana business within a municipality, city and county, or the unincorporated portion of a county unless the governing body of the municipality or city and county has adopted an ordinance, or the governing body of the county has adopted a resolution, containing specific standards for license issuance, or if no such ordinance or resolution is adopted prior to July 1, 2012, then a local licensing authority shall consider the minimum licensing requirements of this part 3 when issuing a license.

In addition to all other standards applicable to the issuance of licenses under this article 10, the local governing body may adopt additional standards for the issuance of medical marijuana store, medical marijuana cultivation facility, or medical marijuana products manufacturer licenses consistent with the intent of this article 10 that may include, but need not be limited to:

Distance restrictions between premises for which local licenses are issued;

Reasonable restrictions on the size of an applicant's licensed premises; and

Any other requirements necessary to ensure the control of the premises and the ease of enforcement of the terms and conditions of the license.

An application for a license specified in subsection (1) of this section must be filed with the state licensing authority and the appropriate local licensing authority on forms provided by the state licensing authority and must contain such information as the state licensing authority may require and any forms as the local licensing authority may require. Each application must be verified by the oath or affirmation of the persons prescribed by the state licensing authority.

An applicant shall file, at the time of application for a license, plans and specifications for the interior of the building if the building to be occupied is in existence at the time. If the building is not in existence, the applicant shall file a plot plan and a detailed sketch for the interior and submit an architect's drawing of the building to be constructed. In its discretion, the local or state licensing authority may impose additional requirements necessary for the approval of the application.

Retail marijuana businesses.

When the state licensing authority receives an application for original licensing or renewal of an existing license or permit for any retail marijuana business, the state licensing authority shall provide, within seven days, a copy of the application to the local jurisdiction in which the business is to be located unless the local jurisdiction has prohibited the operation of retail marijuana businesses pursuant to section 16 (5)(f) of article XVIII of the state constitution. The local jurisdiction shall determine whether the application complies with local restrictions on time, place, manner, and the number of retail marijuana businesses. The local jurisdiction shall inform the state licensing authority whether the application complies with local restrictions on time, place, manner, and the number of retail marijuana businesses.

A local jurisdiction may impose a separate local licensing requirement for retail marijuana businesses as a part of its restrictions on time, place, manner, and the number of marijuana businesses. A local jurisdiction may decline to impose any local licensing requirements, but a local jurisdiction shall notify the state licensing authority that it either approves or denies each application forwarded to it.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2857, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-301 and 44-12-301 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-302. Local license fees - medical marijuana.

Each application for a local license for a medical marijuana business provided for in section 44-10-301 (1) filed with a local licensing authority must be accompanied by an application fee in an amount determined by the local licensing authority.

License fees as determined by the local licensing authority must be paid to the treasurer of the municipality, city and county, or county where the licensed premises is located in advance of the approval, denial, or renewal of the license.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2859, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-1-503 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-303. Public hearing notice - posting and publication.

Medical marijuana business licenses.

Upon receipt of an application for a local license for a medical marijuana business, except an application for renewal or for transfer of ownership, a local licensing authority may schedule a public hearing upon the application to be held not less than thirty days after the date of the application. If the local licensing authority schedules a hearing for a medical marijuana business license application, it shall post and publish public notice thereof not less than ten days prior to the hearing. The local licensing authority shall give public notice by posting a sign in a conspicuous place on the license applicant's premises for which license application has been made and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the applicant's premises are located.

Public notice given by posting must include a sign of suitable material, not less than twenty-two inches wide and twenty-six inches high, composed of letters not less than one inch in height and stating the type of license applied for, the date of the application, the date of the hearing, the name and address of the applicant, and such other information as may be required to fully apprise the public of the nature of the application. The sign must contain the names and addresses of the officers, directors, or manager of the facility to be licensed.

Public notice given by publication must contain the same information as that required for signs.

If the building in which medical marijuana is to be cultivated, manufactured, or distributed is in existence at the time of the application, a sign posted as required in subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be placed so as to be conspicuous and plainly visible to the general public. If the building is not constructed at the time of the application, the applicant shall post a sign at the premises upon which the building is to be constructed in such a manner that the notice is conspicuous and plainly visible to the general public.

Medical marijuana application review.

When conducting its application review, the state licensing authority may advise the local licensing authority of any items that it finds that could result in the denial of the license application. Upon correction of the noted discrepancies, if the correction is permitted by the state licensing authority, the state licensing authority shall notify the local licensing authority of its conditional approval of the license application amendments. The state licensing authority shall then issue the applicant's state license, which is conditioned upon local authority approval.

All applications submitted for review must be accompanied by all applicable state and local license and application fees. Any applications that are later denied or withdrawn may allow for a refund of license fees only. All application fees provided by an applicant must be retained by the respective licensing authority.

Retail marijuana business licenses.

If a local jurisdiction issues local licenses for a retail marijuana business, a local jurisdiction may schedule a public hearing on the application. If the local jurisdiction schedules a hearing, it shall post and publish public notice thereof not less than ten days prior to the hearing. The local jurisdiction shall give public notice by posting a sign in a conspicuous place on the license applicant's premises for which a local license application has been made and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the applicant's premises are located.

If a local jurisdiction does not issue local retail marijuana business licenses, the local jurisdiction may give public notice of the state license application by posting a sign in a conspicuous place on the state license applicant's premises for which a state license application has been made and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the applicant's premises are located.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2859, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-302 and 44-12-302 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-304. Results of investigation - decision of authorities - medical marijuana.

Not less than five days prior to the date of the public hearing authorized in section 44-10-303, the local licensing authority shall make known its findings, based on its investigation, in writing to the applicant and other parties of interest. The local licensing authority has authority to refuse to issue a license provided for in this section for good cause, subject to judicial review.

Before entering a decision approving or denying the application for a local medical marijuana business license, the local licensing authority may consider, except where this article 10 specifically provides otherwise, the facts and evidence adduced as a result of its investigation, as well as any other facts pertinent to the type of license for which application has been made, including the number, type, and availability of medical marijuana stores, medical marijuana cultivation facilities, or medical marijuana products manufacturers located in or near the premises under consideration, and any other pertinent matters affecting the qualifications of the applicant for the conduct of the type of business proposed.

Within thirty days after the public hearing or completion of the application investigation, a local licensing authority shall issue its decision approving or denying an application for local licensure. The decision must be in writing and must state the reasons for the decision. The local licensing authority shall send a copy of the decision by certified mail to the applicant at the address shown in the application.

After approval of an application, the local licensing authority shall not issue a local license until the building in which the business to be conducted is ready for occupancy with such furniture, fixtures, and equipment in place as are necessary to comply with the applicable provisions of this article 10, and then only after the state or local licensing authority has inspected the premises to determine that the applicant has complied with the architect's drawing and the plot plan and detailed sketch for the interior of the building submitted with the application pursuant to section 44-10-301 (4).

After approval of an application for conditional state licensure, the state licensing authority shall notify the local licensing authority of such approval. After approval of an application for local licensure, the local licensing authority shall notify the state licensing authority of such approval, and the state licensing authority shall investigate and either approve or disapprove the application for state licensure.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2860, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-303 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-305. State licensing authority - application and issuance procedures.

Applications for a state medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business license under the provisions of this article 10 must be made to the state licensing authority on forms prepared and furnished by the state licensing authority and must set forth such information as the state licensing authority may require to enable the state licensing authority to determine whether a state medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business license should be granted. The information must include the name and address of the applicant, disclosures required by section 44-10-309, and all other information deemed necessary by the state licensing authority. Each application must be verified by the oath or affirmation of such person or persons as the state licensing authority may prescribe.

The state licensing authority shall issue a state license to a medical marijuana store, a medical marijuana cultivation facility, a medical marijuana products manufacturer, a medical marijuana testing facility, a medical marijuana transporter, a medical marijuana business operator, or a marijuana research and development facility pursuant to this section upon satisfactory completion of the applicable criminal history background check associated with the application, and the state license is conditioned upon local licensing authority approval. A license applicant is prohibited from operating a licensed medical marijuana business without both state and local licensing authority approval. The denial of an application by the local licensing authority is considered as a basis for the state licensing authority to revoke the state-issued license.

The state licensing authority may issue a state license to an applicant pursuant to this section for a retail marijuana business upon completion of the applicable criminal history background check associated with the application, and the state license is conditioned upon local jurisdiction approval. A license applicant is prohibited from operating a licensed retail marijuana business without state and local jurisdiction approval. If the applicant does not receive local jurisdiction approval within one year from the date of state licensing authority approval, the state license expires and may not be renewed. If an application is denied by the local licensing authority, the state licensing authority shall revoke the state-issued license.

Repealed.

Nothing in this article 10 preempts or otherwise impairs the power of a local government to enact ordinances or resolutions concerning matters authorized to local governments.

Prior to accepting an application for a license, registration, or permit, the state licensing authority shall inform the applicant that having a medical marijuana or retail marijuana license and working in the medical marijuana or retail marijuana industry may have adverse federal immigration consequences.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2861, § 5, effective January 1, 2020; (2)(b) amended, (HB 19-1230), ch. 340, p. 3119, § 15, effective January 1, 2020.

44-10-306. Denial of application.

The state licensing authority shall deny a state license if the premises on which the applicant proposes to conduct its business does not meet the requirements of this article 10 or for reasons set forth in section 44-10-103 (17)(c) or 44-10-305, and the state licensing authority may refuse or deny a license, renewal, reinstatement, or initial license for good cause as defined by section 44-10-103 (17)(a) or (17)(b).

If the state licensing authority denies a state license pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the applicant is entitled to a hearing pursuant to section 24-4-104 (9) and judicial review pursuant to section 24-4-106. The state licensing authority shall provide written notice of the grounds for denial of the state license to the applicant and to the local licensing authority at least fifteen days prior to the hearing.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2862, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-305 and 44-12-304 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-307. Persons prohibited as licensees - definition.

A license provided by this article 10 shall not be issued to or held by:

A person until the fee therefore has been paid;

An individual whose criminal history indicates that he or she is not of good moral character after considering the factors in section 24-5-101 (2);

A person other than an individual if the criminal history of any of its controlling beneficial owners indicates that a controlling beneficial owner is not of good moral character after considering the factors in section 24-5-101 (2);

A person under twenty-one years of age;

A person licensed pursuant to this article 10 who, during a period of licensure, or who, at the time of application, has failed to:

File any tax return with a taxing agency related to a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business;

Pay any taxes, interest, or penalties due as determined by final agency action related to a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business;

A person who fails to meet qualifications for licensure that directly and demonstrably relate to the operation of a medical marijuana business;

A person who was convicted of a felony in the three years immediately preceding his or her application date or who is currently subject to a sentence for a felony conviction; except that, for a person applying to be a social equity licensee, a marijuana conviction shall not be the sole basis for license denial; or

A person who is currently subject to a deferred judgment or sentence for a felony;

A person who employs another person at a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business who has not submitted fingerprints for a criminal history record check or whose criminal history record check reveals that the person is ineligible;

A sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or prosecuting officer, or an officer or employee of the state licensing authority or a local licensing authority;

A person applying for a license for a location that is currently licensed as a retail food establishment;

A publicly traded entity that does not constitute a publicly traded corporation as defined in this article 10;

A person that is or has a controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or indirect financial interest holder that is organized or formed under the laws of a country determined by the United States secretary of state to have repeatedly provided support for acts of international terrorism or is included among the list of "covered countries" in section 1502 of the federal "Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act", Pub.L. 111-203;

A person that is or has a controlling beneficial owner that is an "ineligible issuer" pursuant to section 44-10-103 (50)(d)(I);

A person that is or has a controlling beneficial owner that is disqualified as a "bad actor" pursuant to 17 CFR 230.506 (d)(1);

A person that is not a publicly traded corporation that is or has a passive beneficial owner or indirect financial interest holder that is disqualified as a "bad actor" pursuant to 17 CFR 230.506 (d)(1);

A person that is a publicly traded corporation that is or has a nonobjecting passive beneficial owner or indirect financial interest holder that is disqualified as a "bad actor" pursuant to 17 CFR 230.506 (d)(1); or

A person that is or has a controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or indirect financial interest holder that is prohibited from engaging in transactions pursuant to this article 10 due to its designation on the "Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons" list maintained by the federal office of foreign assets control.

The state licensing authority may deny or revoke a license if the applicant or licensee's criminal character or criminal record poses a threat to the regulation or control of marijuana.

A medical marijuana license provided by this article 10 shall not be issued to or held by:

A licensed physician making patient recommendations; or

A person whose authority to be a primary caregiver as defined in section 25-1.5-106 (2) has been revoked by the state health agency.

In investigating the qualifications of an applicant or a licensee, the state and local licensing authorities may have access to criminal history record information furnished by a criminal justice agency subject to any restrictions imposed by such agency. In the event the state or local licensing authority considers the applicant's criminal history record, the state or local licensing authority shall also consider any information provided by the applicant regarding such criminal history record, including but not limited to evidence of rehabilitation, character references, and educational achievements, especially those items pertaining to the period of time between the applicant's last criminal conviction and the consideration of the application for a state license.

As used in subsection (4)(a) of this section, "criminal justice agency" means any federal, state, or municipal court or any governmental agency or subunit of such agency that administers criminal justice pursuant to a statute or executive order and that allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice.

At the time of filing an application for issuance or renewal of a state medical marijuana business license or retail marijuana business license, an applicant shall submit a set of his or her fingerprints and file personal history information concerning the applicant's qualifications for a state license on forms prepared by the state licensing authority. The state or local licensing authority or local jurisdiction shall submit the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the state or local licensing authority or local jurisdiction shall require an applicant or a license holder to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). The state or local licensing authority or local jurisdiction shall use the information resulting from the fingerprint-based criminal history record check to investigate and determine whether an applicant is qualified to hold a state or local license pursuant to this article 10. The state or local licensing authority or local jurisdiction may verify any of the information an applicant is required to submit.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2862, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(1)(g)(I) amended, (HB 20-1424), ch. 184, p. 844, § 4, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(n), (1)(o), and (1)(p) amended, (HB 21-1178), ch. 130, p. 524, § 4, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(4)(c) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 535, § 57, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-306 and 44-12-305 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-308. Business and owner requirements - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Medical marijuana businesses and retail marijuana businesses need to be able to access capital in order to effectively grow their businesses and remain competitive in the marketplace;

The current regulatory structure for regulated marijuana and regulated marijuana products creates a substantial barrier to investment from out-of-state interests and publicly traded corporations;

There is insufficient capital in the state to properly fund the capital needs of Colorado medical marijuana businesses and retail marijuana businesses;

Colorado medical marijuana businesses and retail marijuana businesses need to have ready access to capital from investors from outside of Colorado;

(IV.5) Under certain circumstances, permitting publicly traded corporations to hold an interest in medical marijuana businesses will benefit Colorado's medical marijuana market;

Providing access to legitimate sources of capital helps prevent the opportunity for those who engage in illegal activity to gain entry into the state's regulated medical and retail marijuana market;

Publicly traded corporations offering securities for investment in medical marijuana businesses or retail marijuana businesses must tell the public the truth about their business, the securities they are selling, and the risks involved with investing in medical marijuana businesses or retail marijuana businesses, and persons that sell and trade securities related to medical marijuana businesses or retail marijuana businesses are prohibited from engaging in deceit, misrepresentations, and other fraud in the sale of the securities; and

Recognizing that participation by publicly traded corporations in Colorado's medical marijuana industry and retail marijuana industry creates an increased need to assess barriers of entry for minority- and woman-owned businesses, with such efforts being made to identify solutions to arrive at a greater balance and for further equity for minority- and woman-owned businesses, and in a manner that is consistent with the public safety and enforcement goals as stated in this subsection (1), it is therefore of substantive importance to address the lack of minority- and woman-owned businesses' inclusion in Colorado's medical marijuana industry and retail marijuana industry, social justice issues associated with marijuana prohibition, suitability issues relating to past convictions for potential licensees, licensing fees, and economic challenges that arise with the application processes.

Therefore, the general assembly is providing a mechanism for Colorado medical marijuana businesses and retail marijuana businesses to access capital from investors in other states and from certain publicly traded corporations pursuant to this article 10.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

All natural persons with day-to-day operational control over the business must be Colorado residents.

A person, other than an individual, that is a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business or a controlling beneficial owner shall appoint and continuously maintain a registered agent that satisfies the requirements of section 7-90-701. The medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business shall inform the state licensing authority of a change in the registered agent within ten days after the change.

Effective January 1, 2021, a person who qualifies as a social equity licensee may apply for any regulated marijuana business license or permit, including but not limited to accelerator store, accelerator cultivator, and accelerator manufacturer licenses, issued pursuant to this article 10. A person qualifies as a social equity licensee if such person meets the following criteria, in addition to any criteria established by rule of the state licensing authority:

Is a Colorado resident;

Has not been the beneficial owner of a license subject to disciplinary or legal action from the state resulting in the revocation of a license issued pursuant to this article 10;

Has demonstrated at least one of the following:

The applicant has resided for at least fifteen years between the years 1980 and 2010 in a census tract designated by the office of economic development and international trade as an opportunity zone or designated as a disproportionate impacted area as defined by rule pursuant to section 44-10-203 (1)(j);

The applicant or the applicant's parent, legal guardian, sibling, spouse, child, or minor in their guardianship was arrested for a marijuana offense, convicted of a marijuana offense, or was subject to civil asset forfeiture related to a marijuana investigation; or

The applicant's household income in the year prior to application did not exceed an amount determined by rule of the state licensing authority; and

The social equity licensee, or collectively one or more social equity licensees, holds at least fifty-one percent of the beneficial ownership of the regulated marijuana business license.

A person who meets the criteria in this section for a social equity licensee, pursuant to rule and agency discretion, may be eligible for incentives available through the department of revenue or office of economic development and international trade, including but not limited to a reduction in application or license fees.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2865, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(4) and (5) added, (HB 20-1424), ch. 184, p. 844, § 5, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(a)(VII) amended, (HB 21-1178), ch. 130, p. 525, § 5, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-307 and 44-12-306 as they existed prior to 2020.

44-10-309. Business owner and financial interest disclosure requirements.

Applicants for the issuance of a state license shall disclose to the state licensing authority the following:

A complete and accurate organizational chart of the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business reflecting the identity and ownership percentages of its controlling beneficial owners;

The following information regarding all controlling beneficial owners of the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business:

If the controlling beneficial owner is a publicly traded corporation, the applicant shall disclose the controlling beneficial owners' managers and any beneficial owners that directly or indirectly beneficially own ten percent or more of the owner's interest in the controlling beneficial owner.

If the controlling beneficial owner is not a publicly traded corporation and is not a qualified private fund, the applicant shall disclose the controlling beneficial owner's managers and any beneficial owners that directly or indirectly beneficially own ten percent or more of the owner's interest in the controlling beneficial owner.

If the controlling beneficial owner is a qualified private fund, the applicant shall disclose a complete and accurate organizational chart of the qualified private fund reflecting the identity and ownership percentages of the qualified private fund's managers, investment advisers, investment adviser representatives, any trustee or equivalent, and any other person that controls the investment in, or management or operations of, the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business.

If the controlling beneficial owner is a natural person, the applicant shall disclose the natural person's identifying information.

A person that is both a passive beneficial owner and an indirect financial interest holder in the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business; and

Any indirect financial interest holder that holds two or more indirect financial interests in the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business or that is contributing over fifty percent of the operating capital of the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business.

The state licensing authority may request that the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business disclose the following:

Each beneficial owner and affiliate of an applicant, medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business, or controlling beneficial owner that is not a publicly traded corporation or a qualified private fund; and

Each affiliate of a controlling beneficial owner that is a qualified private fund.

For reasonable cause, the state licensing authority may require disclosure of:

A complete and accurate list of each nonobjecting beneficial interest owner of an applicant, medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business, or controlling beneficial owner that is a publicly traded corporation;

Passive beneficial owners of the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business, and for any passive beneficial owner that is not a natural person, the members of the board of directors, general partners, managing members, or managers and ten percent or more owners of the passive beneficial owner;

A list of each beneficial owner in a qualified private fund that is a controlling beneficial owner;

All indirect financial interest holders of the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business, and for any indirect financial interest holder that is not a natural person and ten percent or more beneficial owners of the indirect financial interest holder.

An applicant or medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that is not a publicly traded corporation shall affirm under penalty of perjury that it exercised reasonable care to confirm that its passive beneficial owners, indirect financial interest holders, and qualified institutional investors are not persons prohibited pursuant to section 44-10-307, or otherwise restricted from holding an interest under this article 10. An applicant's or medical marijuana business's or retail marijuana business's failure to exercise reasonable care is a basis for denial, fine, suspension, revocation, or other sanction by the state licensing authority.

An applicant or medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that is a publicly traded corporation shall affirm under penalty of perjury that it exercised reasonable care to confirm that its nonobjecting passive beneficial owners, indirect financial interest holders, and qualified institutional investors are not persons prohibited pursuant to section 44-10-307, or otherwise restricted from holding an interest under this article 10. An applicant's or medical marijuana business's or retail marijuana business's failure to exercise reasonable care is a basis for denial, fine, suspension, revocation, or other sanction by the state licensing authority.

This section does not restrict the state licensing authority's ability to reasonably request information or records at renewal or as part of any other investigation following initial licensure of a medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, require additional disclosures if such information is full and fair with respect to the investment or in the interest of investor protection.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2868, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

44-10-310. Business owner and financial interest suitability requirements.

This section applies to all persons required to submit a finding of suitability.

Any person intending to become a controlling beneficial owner of any medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business, except as otherwise provided in section 44-10-312 (4), shall first submit a request to the state licensing authority for a finding of suitability or an exemption from an otherwise required finding of suitability.

For reasonable cause, any other person that was disclosed or that should have been disclosed pursuant to section 44-10-309, including but not limited to a passive beneficial owner, shall submit a request for a finding of suitability.

Failure to provide all requested information in connection with a request for a finding of suitability is grounds for denial of that finding of suitability.

Failure to receive all required findings of suitability is grounds for denial of an application or for suspension, revocation, or other sanction against the license by the state licensing authority. For initial applications, the finding of suitability shall be required prior to submitting the application for licensure.

Any person required to obtain a finding of suitability shall do so on forms provided by the state licensing authority, and the forms must contain such information as the state licensing authority may require. Each suitability application must be verified by the oath or affirmation of the persons prescribed by the state licensing authority.

A person requesting a finding of suitability shall provide the state licensing authority with a deposit to cover the direct and indirect costs of any investigation necessary to determine any required finding of suitability unless otherwise established by rule. The state licensing authority may make further rules regarding the deposit and direct and indirect costs that must be billed against the deposit, unless otherwise established by rule.

When determining whether a person is suitable or unsuitable for licensure, the state licensing authority may consider the person's criminal character or record, licensing character or record, or financial character or record.

A person that would otherwise be required to obtain a finding of suitability may request an exemption from the state licensing authority as determined by rule.

Absent reasonable cause, the state licensing authority shall approve or deny a request for a finding of suitability within one hundred twenty days from the date of submission of the request for such finding.

The state licensing authority may deny, suspend, revoke, fine, or impose other sanctions against a person's license issued pursuant to this article 10 if the state licensing authority finds the person or the person's controlling beneficial owner, passive beneficial owner, or indirect financial interest holder to be unsuitable pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2870, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.